Hawaii statutes.
[§474-1] Definitions. For purposes of
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Applicant" means any person acting
on the person's own behalf or who is authorized to act on behalf of any other
person for the purpose of securing required permits to engage in business
activities in the State.

"Center" means the business action
center established in section 474-2.

"Department" means the department of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Permit" means any license,
certificate, registration, or any other form of authorization required by a
federal, state, or county department or agency to engage in any business
activity, excluding vocational and professional occupational licenses,
certificates, or registration and environmental permits.

"Person" means any individual,
proprietorship, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, nonprofit
organization, and any other organization required to obtain one or more permits
for the conduct of its business activities.

"State agency" means any department,
board, bureau, commission, division, office, council, or agency of the State, a
public benefit corporation, or public authority having at least one member
appointed by the governor. [L 2005, c 62, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next